test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_lyeme_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - lyeme: # MLO, ok
    lyeme+N+Sg+Nom: lyeme
    lyeme+N+Sg+Gen: luámmán
    lyeme+N+Sg+Acc: luámmán
    lyeme+N+Sg+Ill: luámánân
    lyeme+N+Sg+Loc: luámánist
    lyeme+N+Sg+Com: luámánáin
    lyeme+N+Sg+Abe: luámmánttáá
    lyeme+N+Ess: [lyemeen, luámánin]
    lyeme+N+Par: [lyemeed, luámánid]
    lyeme+N+Pl+Nom: luámáneh
    lyeme+N+Pl+Gen: luámánij
    lyeme+N+Pl+Acc: luámánijd
    lyeme+N+Pl+Ill: luámánáid
    lyeme+N+Pl+Loc: luámánijn
    lyeme+N+Pl+Com: [luámánijguin, luámánijgijn]
    lyeme+N+Pl+Abe: luámánijttáá

  Noun - siämu: # MLO, ok
    siämu+N+Sg+Nom: siämu
    siämu+N+Sg+Gen: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Acc: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Ill: siämunân
    siämu+N+Sg+Loc: siämunist
    siämu+N+Sg+Com: siämunáin
    siämu+N+Sg+Abe: siämmunttáá
    siämu+N+Ess: [siämun, siämunin]
    siämu+N+Par: [siämud, siämunid]
    siämu+N+Pl+Nom: siämuneh
    siämu+N+Pl+Gen: siämunij
    siämu+N+Pl+Acc: siämunijd
    siämu+N+Pl+Ill: siämunáid
    siämu+N+Pl+Loc: siämunijn
    siämu+N+Pl+Com: [siämunijguin, siämunijgijn]
    siämu+N+Pl+Abe: siämunijttáá

  Noun - siemâ: # MLO, ok
    siemâ+N+Sg+Nom: siemâ
    siemâ+N+Sg+Gen: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Acc: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Ill: siemânân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Loc: siemânist
    siemâ+N+Sg+Com: siemânáin
    siemâ+N+Sg+Abe: siemmânttáá
    siemâ+N+Ess: [siemân, siemânin]
    siemâ+N+Par: [siemâd, siemânid]
    siemâ+N+Pl+Nom: siemâneh
    siemâ+N+Pl+Gen: siemânij
    siemâ+N+Pl+Acc: siemânijd
    siemâ+N+Pl+Ill: siemânáid
    siemâ+N+Pl+Loc: siemânijn
    siemâ+N+Pl+Com: [siemânijguin, siemânijgijn]
    siemâ+N+Pl+Abe: siemânijttáá

  Noun - riesâ: # MLO, ok
    riesâ+N+Sg+Nom: riesâ
    riesâ+N+Sg+Gen: riessâm
    riesâ+N+Sg+Acc: riessâm
    riesâ+N+Sg+Ill: riesâmân
    riesâ+N+Sg+Loc: riesâmist
    riesâ+N+Sg+Com: riesâmáin
    riesâ+N+Sg+Abe: riessâmttáá
    riesâ+N+Ess: [riesân, riesâmin]
    riesâ+N+Par: [riesâd, riesâmid]
    riesâ+N+Pl+Nom: riesâmeh
    riesâ+N+Pl+Gen: riesâmij
    riesâ+N+Pl+Acc: riesâmijd
    riesâ+N+Pl+Ill: riesâmáid
    riesâ+N+Pl+Loc: riesâmijn
    riesâ+N+Pl+Com: [riesâmijguin, riesâmijgijn]
    riesâ+N+Pl+Abe: riesâmijttáá
